reconstruct/burmese-ortho.foma
#!/usr/local/bin/foma -f

##########################################################
## Burmese (Library of Congress): orthographical filter ##
##########################################################

# In order to treat discrepancies between the Burmese orthography, as well as
# the Library of Congress romanization which closely follows it, and the actual
# underlying book-phonology, several passes are required to rewrite the
# original transcription to something closer to the transcription of Old
# Burmese used in the dictionary.

# First, an implementation of Library of Congress romanization

# Burmese script distinguishes between a full variant ññ and a special variant
# ñ, without any Old Burmese level importance
define remove⋄ññ [{ññ} -> ñ];
define InsertGlottalStop [0 -> ʼ // .#. _ [ a | e | i | o | u ] ];

define WBLCSimpleInitial [
   p:{p } |  {ph}:{ph } | b:{b } |  {bh}:{bh } | m:{m } |  {mh}:{m̥ } |
   t:{t } |  {th}:{th } | d:{d } |  {dh}:{dh } | n:{n } |  {nh}:{n̥ } |
   ṭ:{ʈ } |  {ṭh}:{ʈh } | ḍ:{ɖ } |  {ḍh}:{ɖh } | ṇ:{ɳ } |  {ṇh}:{ɳ̥ } |
   k:{k } |  {kh}:{kh } | g:{g } |  {gh}:{gh } | ṅ:{ŋ } |  {ṅh}:{ŋ̊ } |
   c:{tɕ } | {ch}:{tɕh } | j:{dʑ } | {jh}:{dʑh } | ñ:{ɲ } | {ñh}:{ɲ̥ } |
   s:{s } ];

define WBLCSimpleInitial⇒ [ WBLCSimpleInitial:{i } ];

define WBLCInitial [
   WBLCSimpleInitial |
   r:{r } |  {rh}:{r̥ } |
   l:{l } |  {lh}:{l̥ } |
   {ly}:{lj } |  {lhy}:{l̥j } |
   y:{j } |  {yh}:{j̥ } |
   v:{w } |  {vh}:{w̥ } |
   h:{h } |
   ʼ:{ʔ } ];

define WBLCInitial⇒ [ WBLCInitial:{i } ];

# for rimes, some rewriting of the orthography
define WBLCRhymeRewrite [ {ui} -> {ui0}, {ai} -> {aiḥ} || _ .#. ]
  .o. [ {ṃ} -> {mʻ} ]
  .o.
  [ {a} -> {aʔ} , {āʺ} -> {aḥ} , {ā} -> {a0}
   , {i} -> {iʔ} , {īʺ} -> {iḥ} , {ī} -> {i0}
   , {u} -> {uʔ} , {ūʺ} -> {uḥ} , {ū} -> {u0}
   , {eʹ} -> {eʔ} , {eʺ} -> {eḥ} , {e} -> {e0}
   , {uiʹ} -> {uiʔ} , {uiʺ} -> {uiḥ} , {ui} -> {ui0}
   , {aiʹ} -> {aiʔ} , {ai} -> {aiḥ} , {ayʻ} -> {ai0}
   , {oʹ} -> {oʔ} , {o} -> {oḥ} , {oʻ} -> {o0}
   , {mʻʹ} -> {mʔ} , {mʻʺ} -> {mḥ} , {mʻ} -> {m0}
   , {ñʻʹ} -> {ñʔ} , {ñʻʺ} -> {ñḥ} , {ñʻ} -> {ñ0}
   , {nʻʹ} -> {nʔ} , {nʻʺ} -> {nḥ} , {nʻ} -> {n0}
   , {ṅʻʹ} -> {ṅʔ} , {ṅʻʺ} -> {ṅḥ} , {ṅʻ} -> {ṅ0}
   , {pʻ} -> {p}
   , {tʻ} -> {t}
   , {cʻ} -> {c}
   , {kʻ} -> {k}
   || _ .#. ];

define WBLCSimpleVowelRime [a:{a } | i:{i } | u:{u } | e:{e } | {ui}:{ə } | o:{o } | {va}:{wa } | {ve}:{we }];

define WBLCSimpleVowelRime⇒ [ WBLCSimpleVowelRime:{n } ];

define WBLCSonorantCodaRime [
   {ai}:{a j } | 
   {am}:{a m } | {an}:{a n } | {aṅ}:{a ŋ } | {añ}:{a ɲ } |
   {im}:{i m } | {in}:{i n } |
   {vai}:{wa j } |
   {vam}:{wa m } | {van}:{wa n } | {vaṅ}:{wa ŋ } |
   {uiṅ}:{ə ŋ } |
   {un}:{u n } | {um}:{u m } |
   {oṅ}:{o ŋ } ];

define WBLCSonorantCodaRime⇒ [ WBLCSonorantCodaRime:{n c } ];

define WBLCTonefulRime [ WBLCSimpleVowelRime | WBLCSonorantCodaRime ];

define WBLCTonefulRime⇒ [ WBLCSimpleVowelRime⇒ | WBLCSonorantCodaRime⇒ ];

define WBLCTone [{0}:{²²} | ʔ:{⁵³} | ḥ:{⁵⁵}];

define WBLCTone⇒ [ WBLCTone:{t} ];

define WBLCStopcodaRime [
   {ak}:{a k } | {ap}:{a p } | {at}:{a t } | {ac}:{a c } |
   {ip}:{i p } | {it}:{i t } |
   {vap}:{wa p } |{vat}:{wa t } | {vak}:{wa k } |
   {uik}:{ə k } |
   {up}:{u p } | {ut}:{u t } |
   {ok}:{o k }];

define WBLCStopcodaRime⇒ [ WBLCStopcodaRime:{n c } ];

define WBLCDefaultStopcodaTone [0:{⁴}];

define WBLCRime [ [WBLCTonefulRime WBLCTone] |
[ WBLCStopcodaRime WBLCDefaultStopcodaTone] ];

define WBLCRime⇒ [
   [WBLCTonefulRime⇒ WBLCTone⇒] |
   WBLCStopcodaRime:{n c t} ];

# LC puts "h" at the last position in a diacritics group
define reorderMedials [{rh} -> {hr} , {rvh} -> {hrv} , {vh} -> {hv} , {yh} -> {hy} , {yvh} -> {hyv} || ? _ ] ;

# -w- (LC "v") analysed as part of rhyme, so the only admitted medials are "r"
# and "j"
define WBLCMedial [ r:{r } | y:{j }];
define WBLCMedial⇒ [ WBLCMedial:{m } ];

define WBLCSyllableAfter [ WBLCSimpleInitial (WBLCMedial) WBLCRime | WBLCInitial WBLCRime ];
define WBLCSyllableAfter⇒ [WBLCSimpleInitial⇒ (WBLCMedial⇒) WBLCRime⇒ |
WBLCInitial⇒ WBLCRime⇒ ];

define WBLCSyllable [[ WBLCRhymeRewrite .o. InsertGlottalStop .o. remove⋄ññ .o. reorderMedials] .o. WBLCSyllableAfter ];
define WBLCSyllable⇒ [[ WBLCRhymeRewrite .o. InsertGlottalStop .o. remove⋄ññ .o. reorderMedials] .o. WBLCSyllableAfter⇒ ];

clear
push WBLCSyllable
save stack wb-lc-ortho.bin

clear
push WBLCSyllable⇒
save stack wb-lc-ortho-template.bin

###########################################
## Burmese (Luce): orthographical filter ##
###########################################

define WBLuceRewrite [ ŋ -> ṅ ];

define WBLuceSimpleInitial [
   p:{p } |  {p‘}:{ph } | b:{b } |  {b‘}:{bh } | m:{m } |  {mh}:{m̥ } |
   t:{t } |  {t‘}:{th } | d:{d } |  {d‘}:{dh } | n:{n } |  {nh}:{n̥ } |
   ṭ:{ʈ } |  {ṭ‘}:{ʈh } | ḍ:{ɖ } |  {ḍ‘}:{ɖh } | ṇ:{ɳ } |  {ṇh}:{ɳ̥ } |
   k:{k } |  {k‘}:{kh } | g:{g } |  {g‘}:{gh } | ṅ:{ŋ } |  {ṅh}:{ŋ̊ } |
   c:{tɕ } | {c‘}:{tɕh } | j:{dʑ } | {j‘}:{dʑh } | ñ:{ɲ } | {ñh}:{ɲ̥ } |
   s:{s } ];

define WBLuceSimpleInitial⇒ [ WBLuceSimpleInitial:{i } ];

define WBLuceInitial [
   WBLuceSimpleInitial |
   r:{r } |  {rh}:{r̥ } |
   l:{l } |  {lh}:{l̥ } |
   {ly}:{lj } |  {lhy}:{l̥j } |
   y:{j } |  {yh}:{j̥ } |
   w:{w } |  {wh}:{w̥ } |
   h:{h } |
   ʼ:{ʔ } ];

define WBLuceInitial⇒ [ WBLuceInitial:{i } ];

# for rimes, some rewriting of the orthography
define WBLuceRhymeRewrite [ {ṃ} -> {m}, {ṁ} -> {m}, {ñ-} -> {ñ} ]
  .o.
  [ {aʼ} -> {aʔ} , {ā:} -> {aḥ} , {ā³} -> {a0}
   , {iʼ} -> {iʔ} , {ī:} -> {iḥ} , {ī³} -> {i0}
   , {eʼ} -> {eʔ} , {e:} -> {eḥ} , {e³} -> {e0}
   , {aiʼ} -> {aiʔ} , {ai:} -> {aiḥ} , {ay³} -> {ai0}
   , {oʼ} -> {oʔ} , {o:} -> {oḥ} , {ō³} -> {o0}
   , {uiʼ} -> {uiʔ} , {ui:} -> {uiḥ} , {ui³} -> {ui0}
   , {uʼ} -> {uʔ} , {ū:} -> {uḥ} , {ū³} -> {u0}
   , {mʼ} -> {mʔ} , {m:} -> {mḥ} , {m³} -> {m0}, {m} -> {m0}
   , {ñʼ} -> {ñʔ} , {ñ:} -> {ñḥ} , {ñ³} -> {ñ0} , {ñ} -> {ñ0}
   , {nʼ} -> {nʔ} , {n:} -> {nḥ} , {n³} -> {n0} , {n} -> {n0}
   , {ṅʼ} -> {ṅʔ} , {ṅ:} -> {ṅḥ} , {ṅ³} -> {ṅ0} , {ṅ} -> {ṅ0}
   || _ .#. ];

define WBLuceSimpleVowelRime [a:{a } | i:{i } | u:{u } | e:{e } | {ui}:{ə } | o:{o } | {wa}:{wa } | {we}:{we }];

define WBLuceSimpleVowelRime⇒ [ WBLuceSimpleVowelRime:{n } ];

define WBLuceSonorantCodaRime [
   {ai}:{a j } | 
   {am}:{a m } | {an}:{a n } | {aṅ}:{a ŋ } | {añ}:{a ɲ } |
   {im}:{i m } | {in}:{i n } |
   {wai}:{wa j } |
   {wam}:{wa m } | {wan}:{wa n } | {waṅ}:{wa ŋ } |
   {uiṅ}:{ə ŋ } |
   {un}:{u n } | {um}:{u m } |
   {oṅ}:{o ŋ } ];

define WBLuceSonorantCodaRime⇒ [ WBLuceSonorantCodaRime:{n c } ];

define WBLuceTonefulRime [ WBLuceSimpleVowelRime | WBLuceSonorantCodaRime ];

define WBLuceTonefulRime⇒ [ WBLuceSimpleVowelRime⇒ | WBLuceSonorantCodaRime⇒ ];

define WBLuceTone [{0}:{²²} | ʔ:{⁵³} | ḥ:{⁵⁵}];

define WBLuceTone⇒ [ WBLuceTone:{t} ];

define WBLuceStopcodaRime [
   {ak}:{a k } | {ap}:{a p } | {at}:{a t } | {ac}:{a c } |
   {ip}:{i p } | {it}:{i t } |
   {wap}:{wa p } |{wat}:{wa t } | {wak}:{wa k } |
   {uik}:{ə k } |
   {up}:{u p } | {ut}:{u t } |
   {ok}:{o k }];

define WBLuceStopcodaRime⇒ [ WBLuceStopcodaRime:{n c } ];

define WBLuceDefaultStopcodaTone [0:{⁴}];

define WBLuceRime [ [WBLuceTonefulRime WBLuceTone] |
[ WBLuceStopcodaRime WBLuceDefaultStopcodaTone] ];

define WBLuceRime⇒ [
   [WBLuceTonefulRime⇒ WBLuceTone⇒] |
   WBLuceStopcodaRime:{n c t} ];

# -w- (LC "v") analysed as part of rhyme, so the only admitted medials are "r"
# and "j"
define WBLuceMedial [ r:{r } | y:{j }];
define WBLuceMedial⇒ [ WBLuceMedial:{m } ];

define WBLuceSyllableAfter [ WBLuceSimpleInitial (WBLuceMedial) WBLuceRime | WBLuceInitial WBLuceRime ];
define WBLuceSyllableAfter⇒ [WBLuceSimpleInitial⇒ (WBLuceMedial⇒) WBLuceRime⇒ |
WBLuceInitial⇒ WBLuceRime⇒ ];

define WBLuceSyllable [[ WBLuceRewrite .o. WBLuceRhymeRewrite .o. InsertGlottalStop] .o. WBLuceSyllableAfter ];
define WBLuceSyllable⇒ [[ WBLuceRewrite .o. WBLuceRhymeRewrite .o. InsertGlottalStop] .o. WBLuceSyllableAfter⇒ ];

clear
push WBLuceSyllable
save stack wb-luce-ortho.bin

clear
push WBLuceSyllable⇒
save stack wb-luce-ortho-template.bin


############################################
## Burmese (rime rewritten) to Old Burmese #
############################################

define rewriteAspiration [ ‘ -> h ];
define removeVoicing [ b -> p, d -> t, g -> k, j -> c || .#. _];
define removeGlottalStop [ ʼ -> 0 || .#. _ ];
define v⇒w [ v -> w ];

define rewriteRhyme [ {wa} -> {o₁}, {o} -> {o₂}, {ai} -> {ay}, {e} -> {iy},  {wam} -> {o₁m}, {wan} -> {o₁n}, {waṅ} -> {o₁ṅ}, {ui} -> {uiw}, {oṅ} -> {o₂ṅ} || _ [ ʔ | ḥ | {0} ] .#. ]
.o. [{way} -> {o₁y}, {wiy} -> {uy} || _ [ ʔ | ḥ | {0} ] .#. ];

define rewriteRhymeStopFinal [ {wap} -> {o₁p}, {wat} -> {o₁t}, {wak} -> {o₁k}, {ok} -> {o₂k} || _  .#. ];

define rewriteTone [ {0} -> 0 || _ .#. ];

define WBLucetoStdOB [ WBLuceRewrite .o. WBLuceRhymeRewrite .o. InsertGlottalStop] .o. rewriteAspiration .o. removeVoicing .o. removeGlottalStop .o. v⇒w .o. rewriteRhyme .o. rewriteRhymeStopFinal .o. rewriteTone;

clear
push WBLucetoStdOB
save stack wb-luce-to-stdob.bin
